North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 9. Solid Waste Management.
§ 130A-310.31.
Definitions.

Unless a different meaning is required by the context or unless a different meaning is set out in subsection (b) of this section, the definitions in

G.S. 130A-2

and

G.S. 130A-310

apply throughout this Part.

Unless a different meaning is required by the context:

“Affiliate” has the same meaning as in 17 Code of Federal Regulations § 240.12b-2 (1 April 1996 Edition).

“Brownfields agreement” means an agreement between the Department and a prospective developer that meets the requirements of

G.S. 130A-310

.32.

“Brownfields property” or “brownfields site” means abandoned, idled, or underused property at which expansion or redevelopment is hindered by actual environmental contamination or the possibility of environmental contamination and that is or may be subject
to remediation under any State remedial program or that is or may be subject to remediation under the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, as amended (42 U.S.C. § 9601, et seq.)
except for a site listed on the National Priorities List pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 9605.

“Contaminant” means a regulated substance released into the environment.

“Unrestricted use standards” when used in connection with “cleanup”, “remediated”, or “remediation” means contaminant concentrations for each environmental medium that are considered acceptable for all uses and that comply with generally applicable standards,
guidance, or established methods governing the contaminants that are established by statute or adopted, published, or implemented by the Commission or the Department instead of the site-specific contaminant levels established
pursuant to this Part.

“Environmental contamination” means contaminants at the property requiring remediation and that are to be remediated under the brownfields agreement including, at a minimum, hazardous waste, as defined in

G.S. 130A-290

; a hazardous substance, as defined in

G.S. 130A-310

; a hazardous substance, as defined in

G.S. 143-215.77

; or oil, as defined in

G.S. 143-215.77

.

“Local government” means a town, city, or county.

“Parent” has the same meaning as in 17 Code of Federal Regulations § 240.12b-2 (1 April 1996 Edition).

“Potentially responsible party” means a person who is or may be liable for remediation under a remedial program.

“Prospective developer” means any person with a bona fide, demonstrable desire to develop or redevelop a brownfields property and who did not cause or contribute to the contamination at the brownfields property.

“Regulated substance” means a hazardous waste, as defined in G.S 130A-290; a hazardous substance, as defined in G.S. 143-215.77A; oil, as defined in G.S. 143-215.77; or other substance regulated under any remedial program implemented by the Department.

“Remedial program” means a program implemented by the Department for the remediation of any contaminant, including the Inactive Hazardous Sites Response Act of 1987 under Part 3 of this Article, the Superfund Program under Part 4 of this Article, and
the Oil Pollution and Hazardous Substances Control Act of 1978 under Part 2 of Article 21A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

“Remediation” means action to clean up, mitigate, correct, abate, minimize, eliminate, control, or prevent the spreading, migration, leaking, leaching, volatilization, spilling, transport, or further release of a contaminant into the environment in order
to protect public health or the environment.

“Subsidiary” has the same meaning as in 17 Code of Federal Regulations § 240.12b-2 (1 April 1996 Edition).

History.
1997-357, s. 2; 1997-392, ss. 4.2-4.4; 2001-384, s. 11; 2006-71, ss. 1, 2, 3; 2013-108, s. 1; 2014-122, s. 11(h); 2015-286, s. 4.10(a).

§ 130A-310.32.
Brownfields agreement.

The Department may, in its discretion, enter into a brownfields agreement with a prospective developer who satisfies the requirements of this section. A prospective developer shall provide the Department with any information necessary to demonstrate that:

The prospective developer, and any parent, subsidiary, or other affiliate of the prospective developer has substantially complied with:

The terms of any brownfields agreement or similar agreement to which the prospective developer or any parent, subsidiary, or other affiliate of the prospective developer has been a party.

The requirements applicable to any remediation in which the applicant has previously engaged.

Federal and state laws, regulations, and rules for the protection of the environment.

As a result of the implementation of the brownfields agreement, the brownfields property will be suitable for the uses specified in the agreement while fully protecting public health and the environment instead of being remediated to unrestricted use
standards.

There is a public benefit commensurate with the liability protection provided under this Part.

The prospective developer has or can obtain the financial, managerial, and technical means to fully implement the brownfields agreement and assure the safe use of the brownfields property.

The prospective developer has complied with or will comply with all applicable procedural requirements.

In negotiating a brownfields agreement, parties may rely on land-use restrictions that will be included in a Notice of Brownfields Property required under

G.S. 130A-310.35

. A brownfields agreement may provide for remediation standards that are based on those land-use restrictions.

A brownfields agreement shall contain a description of the brownfields property that would be sufficient as a description of the property in an instrument of conveyance and, as applicable, a statement of:

Any remediation to be conducted on the property, including:

A description of specific areas where remediation is to be conducted.

The remediation method or methods to be employed.

The resources that the prospective developer will make available.

A schedule of remediation activities.

Applicable remediation standards.

A schedule and the method or methods for evaluating the remediation.

Any land-use restrictions that will apply to the brownfields property.

The desired results of any remediation or land-use restrictions with respect to the brownfields property.

The guidelines, including parameters, principles, and policies within which the desired results are to be accomplished.

The consequences of achieving or not achieving the desired results.

Any failure of the prospective developer or the prospective developer’s agents and employees to comply with the brownfields agreement constitutes a violation of this Part by the prospective developer.

History.
1997-357, s. 2; 2001-384, s. 11.

Cross References.

As to taxation of qualifying improvements on brownfields, see

G.S. 105-277.13

.

§ 130A-310.33.
Liability protection.

A prospective developer who enters into a brownfields agreement with the Department and who is complying with the brownfields agreement shall not be held liable for remediation of areas of contaminants identified in the brownfields agreement except as
specified in the brownfields agreement, so long as the activities conducted on the brownfields property by or under the control or direction of the prospective developer do not increase the risk of harm to public health or the
environment and the prospective developer is not required to undertake additional remediation to unrestricted use standards pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. The liability protection provided under this Part applies to
all of the following persons to the same extent as to a prospective developer, so long as these persons are not otherwise potentially responsible parties or parents, subsidiaries, or affiliates of potentially responsible parties
and the person is not required to undertake additional remediation to unrestricted use standards pursuant to subsection (c) of this section:

Any person under the direction or control of the prospective developer who directs or contracts for remediation or redevelopment of the brownfields property.

Any future owner of the brownfields property.

A person who develops or occupies the brownfields property.

A successor or assign of any person to whom the liability protection provided under this Part applies.

Any lender or fiduciary that provides financing for remediation or redevelopment of the brownfields property.

A person who conducts an environmental assessment or transaction screen on a brownfields property and who is not otherwise a potentially responsible party is not a potentially responsible party as a result of conducting the environmental assessment or
transaction screen unless that person increases the risk of harm to public health or the environment by failing to exercise due diligence and reasonable care in performing the environmental assessment or transaction screen.

If a land-use restriction set out in the Notice of Brownfields Property required under

G.S. 130A-310.35

is violated, the owner of the brownfields property at the time the land-use restriction is violated, the owner’s successors and assigns, and the owner’s agents who direct or contract for alteration of the brownfields
property in violation of a land-use restriction shall be liable for remediation to unrestricted use standards. A prospective developer who completes the remediation or redevelopment required under a brownfields agreement or other
person who receives liability protection under this Part shall not be required to undertake additional remediation at the brownfields property unless any of the following apply:

The prospective developer knowingly or recklessly provides false information that forms a basis for the brownfields agreement or that is offered to demonstrate compliance with the brownfields agreement or fails to disclose relevant information about contamination
at the brownfields property.

New information indicates the existence of previously unreported contaminants or an area of previously unreported contamination on or associated with the brownfields property that has not been remediated to unrestricted use standards, unless the brownfields
agreement is amended to include any previously unreported contaminants and any additional areas of contamination. If the brownfields agreement sets maximum concentrations for contaminants, and new information indicates
the existence of previously unreported areas of these contaminants, further remediation shall be required only if the areas of previously unreported contaminants raise the risk of the contamination to public health or the
environment to a level less protective of public health and the environment than that required by the brownfields agreement.

The level of risk to public health or the environment from contaminants is unacceptable at or in the vicinity of the brownfields property due to changes in exposure conditions, including (i) a change in land use that increases the probability of exposure
to contaminants or in the vicinity of the brownfields property or (ii) the failure of remediation to mitigate risks to the extent required to make the brownfields property fully protective of public health and the environment
as planned in the brownfields agreement.

The Department obtains new information about a contaminant associated with the brownfields property or exposures at or around the brownfields property that raises the risk to public health or the environment associated with the brownfields property beyond
an acceptable range and in a manner or to a degree not anticipated in the brownfields agreement. Any person whose use, including any change in use, of the brownfields property causes an unacceptable risk to public health
or the environment may be required by the Department to undertake additional remediation measures under the provisions of this Part.

A prospective developer fails to file a timely and proper Notice of Brownfields Development under this Part.

History.
1997-357, s. 2; 2001-384, s. 11.

§ 130A-310.34.
Public notice and community involvement.

A prospective developer who desires to enter into a brownfields agreement shall notify the public and the community in which the brownfields property is located of planned remediation and redevelopment activities. The prospective developer shall submit
a Notice of Intent to Redevelop a Brownfields Property and a summary of the Notice of Intent to the Department. The Notice of Intent shall provide, to the extent known, a legal description of the location of the brownfields property,
a map showing the location of the brownfields property, a description of the contaminants involved and their concentrations in the media of the brownfields property, a description of the intended future use of the brownfields property,
any proposed investigation and remediation, and a proposed Notice of Brownfields Property prepared in accordance with

G.S. 130A-310.35

. Both the Notice of Intent and the summary of the Notice of Intent shall state the time period and means for submitting written comment and for requesting a public meeting on the proposed brownfields agreement.
The summary of the Notice of Intent shall include a statement as to the public availability of the full Notice of Intent. After approval of the Notice of Intent and summary of the Notice of Intent by the Department, the prospective
developer shall provide a copy of the Notice of Intent to all local governments having jurisdiction over the brownfields property. The prospective developer shall publish the summary of the Notice of Intent in a newspaper of general
circulation serving the area in which the brownfields property is located. The prospective developer shall conspicuously post a copy of the summary of the Notice of Intent at the brownfields property, and the prospective developer
shall mail or deliver a copy of the summary to each owner of property contiguous to the brownfields property. The prospective developer shall submit documentation of the public notices to the Department prior to the Department
entering into a brownfields agreement.

Publication of the approved summary of the Notice of Intent in a newspaper of general circulation, posting the summary at the brownfields property, and mailing or delivering the summary to each owner of property contiguous to the brownfields property
shall begin a public comment period of at least 30 days from the latest date of publication, posting, and mailing or delivering. During the public comment period, members of the public, residents of the community in which the brownfields
property is located, and local governments having jurisdiction over the brownfields property may submit comment on the proposed brownfields agreement, including methods and degree of remediation, future land uses, and impact on
local employment.

Any person who desires a public meeting on a proposed brownfields agreement shall submit a written request for a public meeting to the Department within 21 days after the public comment period begins. The Department shall consider all requests for a public
meeting and shall hold a public meeting if the Department determines that there is significant public interest in the proposed brownfields agreement. If the Department decides to hold a public meeting, the Department shall, at
least 15 days prior to the public meeting, mail written notice of the public meeting to all persons who requested the public meeting and to each owner of property contiguous to the brownfields property. The Department shall also
direct the prospective developer to publish, at least 15 days prior to the date of the public meeting, a notice of the public meeting at least one time in a newspaper having general circulation in such county where the brownfields
property is located. In any county in which there is more than one newspaper having general circulation, the Department shall direct the prospective developer to publish a copy of the notice in as many newspapers having general
circulation in the county as the Department in its discretion determines to be necessary to assure that the notice is generally available throughout the county. The Department shall prescribe the form and content of the notice
to be published. The Department shall prescribe the procedures to be followed in the public meeting. The Department shall take detailed minutes of the meeting. The minutes shall include any written comments, exhibits, or documents
presented at the meeting.

Prior to entering into a brownfields agreement, the Department shall take into account the comment received during the comment period and at the public meeting if the Department holds a public meeting. The Department shall incorporate into the brownfields
agreement provisions that reflect comment received during the comment period and at the public meeting to the extent practical. The Department shall give particular consideration to written comment that is supported by valid scientific
and technical information and analysis and to written comment from the units of local government that have taxing jurisdiction over the brownfields property.

History.
1997-357, s. 2; 2000-158, s. 2; 2006-71, ss. 4, 5; 2009-181, s. 1.

§ 130A-310.35.
Notice of Brownfields Property; land-use restrictions in deed.

In order to reduce or eliminate the danger to public health or the environment posed by a brownfields property being addressed under this Part, a prospective developer who desires to enter into a brownfields agreement with the Department shall submit
to the Department a proposed Notice of Brownfields Property. A Notice of Brownfields Property shall be entitled “Notice of Brownfields Property”, shall include a survey plat of areas designated by the Department that has been prepared
and certified by a professional land surveyor and that meets the requirements of

G.S. 47-30

, shall include a legal description of the brownfields property that would be sufficient as a description of the property in an instrument of conveyance, and shall identify all of the following:

The location and dimensions of the areas of potential environmental concern with respect to permanently surveyed benchmarks.

The type, location, and quantity of regulated substances and contaminants known to exist on the brownfields property.

Any restrictions on the current or future use of the brownfields property or, with the owner’s permission, other property that are necessary or useful to maintain the level of protection appropriate for the designated current or future use of the brownfields
property and that are designated in the brownfields agreement. These land-use restrictions may apply to activities on, over, or under the land, including, but not limited to, use of groundwater, building, filling, grading,
excavating, and mining. Where a brownfields property encompasses more than one parcel or tract of land, a composite map or plat showing all parcels or tracts may be recorded.

After the Department approves and certifies the Notice of Brownfields Property under subsection (a) of this section, a prospective developer who enters into a brownfields agreement with the Department shall file a certified copy of the Notice of Brownfields
Property in the register of deeds’ office in the county or counties in which the land is located. The prospective developer shall file the Notice of Brownfields Property within 15 days of the prospective developer’s receipt of
the Department’s approval of the notice or the prospective developer’s entry into the brownfields agreement, whichever is later.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-18, s. 1.19, effective July 1, 2012.

When a brownfields property is sold, leased, conveyed, or transferred, the deed or other instrument of transfer shall contain in the description section, in no smaller type than that used in the body of the deed or instrument, a statement that the brownfields
property has been classified and, if appropriate, cleaned up as a brownfields property under this Part.

A Notice of Brownfields Property filed pursuant to this section may, at the request of the owner of the land, be cancelled by the Secretary after the hazards have been eliminated. If requested in writing by the owner of the land and if the Secretary concurs
with the request, the Secretary shall send to the register of deeds of each county where the notice is recorded a statement that the hazards have been eliminated and request that the notice be cancelled of record. The Secretary’s
statement shall contain the names of the owners of the land as shown in the notice and reference the plat book and page where the notice is recorded.

Any land-use restriction filed pursuant to this section shall be enforced by any owner of the land. Any land-use restriction may also be enforced by the Department through the remedies provided in Part 2 of Article 1 of this Chapter or by means of a civil
action. The Department may enforce any land-use restriction without first having exhausted any available administrative remedies. A land-use restriction may also be enforced by any unit of local government having jurisdiction over
any part of the brownfields property by means of a civil action without the unit of local government having first exhausted any available administrative remedy. A land-use restriction may also be enforced by any person eligible
for liability protection under this Part who will lose liability protection if the land-use restriction is violated. A land-use restriction shall not be declared unenforceable due to lack of privity of estate or contract, due to
lack of benefit to particular land, or due to lack of any property interest in particular land. Any person who owns or leases a property subject to a land-use restriction under this section shall abide by the land-use restriction.

This section shall apply in lieu of the provisions of

G.S. 130A-310.8

for brownfields properties remediated under this Part.

History.
1997-357, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(b); 2012-18, s. 1.19.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-18, s. 1.19, effective July 1, 2012, deleted subsection (c), regarding the register of deeds recording and indexing the copy of the notice; and deleted the last three sentences of subsection (e), regarding register of deeds recording
and indexing the Secretary’s statement.

§ 130A-310.36.
Appeals.

A decision by the Department as to whether or not to enter into a brownfields agreement including the terms of any brownfields agreement is reviewable under Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

History.
1997-357, s. 2.

§ 130A-310.37.
Construction of Part.

This Part is not intended and shall not be construed to:

Affect the ability of local governments to regulate land use under Article 19 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes and Article 18 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes. The use of the identified brownfields property and any land-use restrictions
in the brownfields agreement shall be consistent with local land-use controls adopted under those statutes.

Amend, modify, repeal, or otherwise alter any provision of any remedial program or other provision of this Chapter, Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, or any other provision of law relating to civil and criminal penalties or enforcement actions and
remedies available to the Department, except as may be provided in a brownfields agreement.

Prevent or impede the immediate response of the Department or responsible party to an emergency that involves an imminent or actual release of a regulated substance that threatens public health or the environment.

Relieve a person receiving liability protection under this Part from any liability for contamination later caused by that person on a brownfields property.

Affect the right of any person to seek any relief available against any party to the brownfields agreement who may have liability with respect to the brownfields property, except that this Part does limit the relief available against any party to a brownfields
agreement with respect to remediation of the brownfields property to the remediation required under the brownfields agreement.

Affect the right of any person who may have liability with respect to the brownfields property to seek contribution from any other person who may have liability with respect to the brownfields property and who neither received nor has liability protection
under this Part.

Prevent the State from enforcing specific numerical remediation standards, monitoring, or compliance requirements specifically required to be enforced by the federal government as a condition to receive program authorization, delegation, primacy, or federal
funds.

Create a defense against the imposition of criminal and civil fines or penalties or administrative penalties otherwise authorized by law and imposed as the result of the illegal disposal of waste or for the pollution of the land, air, or waters of this
State on a brownfields property.

Relieve a person of any liability for failure to exercise due diligence and reasonable care in performing an environmental assessment or transaction screen.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the Tort Claims Act,

G.S. 143-291

through

G.S. 143-300.1

or any other provision of law waiving the sovereign immunity of the State of North Carolina, the State, its agencies, officers, employees, and agents shall be absolutely immune from any liability in any proceeding
for any injury or claim arising from negotiating, entering, monitoring, or enforcing a brownfields agreement or a Notice of Brownfields Property under this Part or any other action implementing this Part.

The Department shall not enter into a brownfields agreement for a site listed on the National Priorities List pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 9605.

History.
1997-357, s. 2; 1997-392, s. 4.5; 2006-71, s. 6.

§ 130A-310.38.
Brownfields Property Reuse Act Implementation Account.

The Brownfields Property Reuse Act Implementation Account is created as a nonreverting account in the Office of the State Treasurer. The Account shall consist of fees and interest collected under

G.S. 130A-310.39

, moneys appropriated to it by the General Assembly, moneys received from the federal government, moneys contributed by private organizations, and moneys received from any other source. Funds in the Account shall be used
by the Department to defray the costs of implementing this Part. The Department may contract with a private entity for any services necessary to implement this Part.

History.
1997-357, s. 2; 1999-360, s. 17.2; 2014-100, s. 14.21(j).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 14.21(j), effective July 1, 2014, deleted “interest-bearing” following “nonreverting” in the first sentence.

§ 130A-310.39.
Fees.

The Department shall collect the following fees:

A prospective developer who submits a proposed brownfields agreement for review by the Department shall pay an initial fee of two thousand dollars ($2,000).

A prospective developer who enters into a brownfields agreement with the Department shall pay a fee in an amount equal to the full cost to the Department and the Department of Justice of all activities related to the brownfields agreement, including but
not limited to negotiation of the brownfields agreement, public notice and community involvement, and monitoring the implementation of the brownfields agreement. The procedure by which the amount of this fee is determined
shall be established by agreement between the prospective developer and the Department and shall be set out as a part of the brownfields agreement. The fee imposed by this subdivision shall be paid in two installments.
The first installment shall be due at the time the prospective developer and the Department enter into the brownfields agreement and shall equal all costs that have been incurred by the Department and the Department of
Justice at that time less the amount of the initial fee paid pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection. The Department shall not enter into the brownfields agreement unless the first installment is paid in full when
due. The second installment shall be due at the time the prospective developer submits a final report certifying completion of remediation under the brownfields agreement and shall include any additional costs that have
been incurred by the Department and the Department of Justice, including all costs of monitoring the implementation of the brownfields agreement.

Fees and interest imposed under this section shall be credited to the Brownfields Property Reuse Act Implementation Account.

If a prospective developer fails to pay the full amount of any fee due under this section, interest on the unpaid portion of the fee shall accrue from the time the fee is due until paid at the rate established by the Secretary of Revenue pursuant to

G.S. 105-241.21

. A lien for the amount of the unpaid fee plus interest shall attach to the real and personal property of the prospective developer and to the brownfields property until the fee and interest is paid. The Department
may collect unpaid fees and interest in any manner that a unit of local government may collect delinquent taxes.

History.
1997-357, s. 2; 1999-360, s. 17.3; 2007-491, s. 44(1)(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-491, s. 44(1)(a), effective January 1, 2008, substituted “G.S. 105-241.21” for “G.S. 105-241.1(i)” in subsection (c).

§ 130A-310.40.
Legislative reports.

The Department shall include in the status of solid waste management report required to be submitted pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.06(c) an evaluation of the effectiveness of this Part in facilitating the remediation and reuse of existing industrial and commercial
properties. This evaluation shall include any recommendations for additional incentives or changes, if needed, to improve the effectiveness of this Part in addressing these properties. This evaluation shall also include a report on
receipts by and expenditures from the Brownfields Property Reuse Act Implementation Account.

History.
1997-357, s. 2; 2017-10, s. 4.14(c); 2020-74, s. 11(h); 2020-78, s. 7.2(h).

§§ 130A-310.41 through 130A-310.49.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 6. Mercury Switch Removal.

§ 130A-310.50.
(Repealed effective June 30, 2031) Definitions.

As used in this Part:

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-142, s. 1, effective June 29, 2007.

“End-of-life vehicle” means a vehicle that is sold, given, or otherwise conveyed to a vehicle crusher, vehicle dismantler, vehicle recycler, or scrap vehicle processing facility for the purpose of recycling.

(2a)
“Inaccessible”, when used in connection with mercury switch, means that, due to the condition of the vehicle, the mercury switch cannot be removed from a vehicle without a significant risk of a release of mercury
into the environment.

(4) Repealed by Session Laws 2007-142, s. 1, effective June 29, 2007.

(4a)
“Mercury recovery performance ratio” means the ratio of the number of pounds of mercury recovered from mercury switches from the State in a calendar year to the estimated number of pounds of mercury available to
be recovered from mercury switches from the State in the same calendar year.

(5)
“Mercury switch” means each capsule or assembly containing mercury that is part of a convenience light switch installed in a vehicle.

(5a)
Reserved for future codification purposes.

(5b)
“National mercury recovery performance ratio” means the ratio of the number of pounds of mercury recovered from mercury switches from the United States in a calendar year to the estimated number of pounds of mercury
available to be recovered from mercury switches from the United States in the same calendar year.

(5c)
“NVMSRP” means the Memorandum of Understanding to establish the National Vehicle Mercury Switch Recovery Program dated 11 August 2006.

(6)
“Scrap vehicle processing facility” means a fixed location where machinery and equipment are used to process scrap vehicles into specification grade commodities including facilities where a shredder or fragmentizer
is used to process scrap vehicles into shredded scrap and facilities where end-of-life vehicles are prepared to be shredded.

(7)
“Vehicle” means any passenger automobile or passenger car, station wagon, truck, van, or sport utility vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of less than 12,000 pounds.

(7a)
“Vehicle crusher” means a person who engages in the business of flattening, crushing, or otherwise processing end-of-life vehicles for recycling. Vehicle crusher includes, but is not limited to, a person who uses
fixed or mobile equipment to flatten or crush end-of-life vehicles for a vehicle recycler or a scrap vehicle processing facility.

(7b)
“Vehicle dismantler” has the same meaning as “vehicle recycler.”

(7c)
“Vehicle manufacturer” means a person, firm, association, partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, combination, or joint venture that is the last person in the production or assembly process
of a motor vehicle that contains one or more mercury switches, or in the case of an imported vehicle, the importer or domestic distributor of the vehicle. “Vehicle manufacturer” does not include any person engaged in the business
of selling new motor vehicles at retail or any person who converts or modifies new motor vehicles after the production or assembly process.

(8)
“Vehicle recycler” means a person or entity engaged in the business of acquiring, dismantling, or destroying six or more end-of-life vehicles in a calendar year for the primary purpose of resale of parts of the
vehicle, including scrap metal.

History.
2005-384, s. 1; 2006-255, s. 5; 2007-142, s. 1; 2016-94, s. 14.1(a); 2017-57, s. 13.21(a); 2020-74, s. 7(a).

Part 6 Has a Delayed Repeal Date.

Session Laws 2007-142, s. 9, as amended by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 14.1(a), as amended by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 13.21(a), and as amended by Session Laws 2020-74, s. 7(a), provides, in part: “Effective June 30, 2031, Part 6 of Article 9 of Chapter
130A of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, is repealed.”

§ 130A-310.51.
(Repealed effective June 30, 2031) Purpose.

The purpose of this Part is to reduce the quantity of mercury that is released into the environment by removing mercury switches from end-of-life vehicles and by creating a removal, collection, and recovery program for mercury switches that are removed
from end-of-life vehicles in this State.

History.
2005-384, s. 1; 2006-255, s. 5; 2016-94, s. 14.1(a); 2017-57, s. 13.21(a); 2020-74, s. 7(a).

Part 6 Has a Delayed Repeal Date.

Session Laws 2007-142, s. 9, as amended by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 14.1(a), as amended by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 13.21(a), and as amended by Session Laws 2020-74, s. 7(a), provides, in part: “Effective June 30, 2031, Part 6 of Article 9 of Chapter
130A of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, is repealed.”

§ 130A-310.52.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-142, s. 2, as amended by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 14.1(a), effective June 29, 2007.

§ 130A-310.53.
(Repealed effective June 30, 2031) Removal of mercury switches from end-of-life vehicles.

A vehicle crusher, vehicle dismantler, vehicle recycler, or scrap vehicle processing facility shall not flatten, crush, bale, or shred an end-of-life vehicle that contains accessible mercury switches. Except as provided in this subsection, a vehicle crusher,
vehicle dismantler, vehicle recycler, or scrap vehicle processing facility shall remove all accessible mercury switches from end-of-life vehicles before the vehicle is flattened, crushed, baled, or shredded, or before the vehicle
is conveyed to another vehicle crusher, vehicle dismantler, vehicle recycler, or scrap vehicle processing facility. If a vehicle crusher, vehicle dismantler, vehicle recycler, or scrap vehicle processing facility conveys an end-of-life
vehicle to another vehicle crusher, vehicle dismantler, vehicle recycler, or scrap vehicle processing facility without removing accessible mercury switches, the receiving vehicle crusher, vehicle dismantler, vehicle recycler, or
scrap vehicle processing facility must agree to accept the end-of-life vehicle and assume responsibility for the proper removal of all accessible mercury switches. The agreement to assume responsibility for the proper removal of
all accessible mercury switches shall be documented on an invoice that is provided by the vehicle crusher, vehicle dismantler, vehicle recycler, or scrap vehicle processing facility to the person to whom the vehicle is conveyed.

A vehicle crusher, vehicle dismantler, vehicle recycler, or scrap vehicle processing facility that removes all accessible mercury switches from an end-of-life vehicle shall mark the vehicle to indicate that all accessible mercury switches have been removed.
The vehicle crusher, vehicle dismantler, vehicle recycler, or scrap vehicle processing facility shall certify to any person to whom the vehicle is conveyed, in a form acceptable to the Department, that all accessible mercury switches
have been removed from the vehicle.

, (d) Repealed by Session Laws 2007-142, s. 3, effective July 1, 2007.

(e)
Mercury switches that are removed from end-of-life vehicles are considered “universal waste” as defined in 40 Code of Federal Regulations § 273.9 (July 1, 2006 Edition). Mercury switches that are removed from end-of-life
vehicles shall be collected, transported, treated, stored, disposed of, and otherwise handled in accordance with rules adopted by the Commission governing universal waste.

(f)
Vehicle manufacturers, in cooperation with the Department, shall develop, implement, and bear the costs of a mercury switch collection system in accordance with the NVMSRP. This system shall be developed and implemented
so as to enhance vehicle recyclability, promote public education and outreach, and provide for the proper removal, collection, and disposal of mercury switches from end-of-life vehicles.

History.
2005-384, s. 1; 2006-255, s. 5; 2007-142, s. 3; 2016-94, s. 14.1(a); 2017-57, s. 13.21(a); 2020-74, s. 7(a).

Part 6 Has a Delayed Repeal Date.

Session Laws 2007-142, s. 9, as amended by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 14.1(a), as amended by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 13.21(a), and as amended by Session Laws 2020-74, s. 7(a), provides, in part: “Effective June 30, 2031, Part 6 of Article 9 of Chapter
130A of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, is repealed.”